Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1663.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 7, article 12, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1293, to read: START_STATUTE41-1293. Freedom of speech monument committee; membership; duties A. The freedom of speech monument committee is established consisting of the following members: 1. The president of the senate, or the president's designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the committee in even-numbered years. 2. The speaker of the house of representatives, or the speaker's designee, who shall serve as the chairperson in odd-numbered years. 3. The senate majority leader or the majority leader's designee. 4. The house of representatives majority leader or the majority leader's designee. 5. The senate minority leader or the minority leader's designee. 6. The house of representatives minority leader or the minority leader's designee. 7. The chief justice of the supreme court or the chief justice's designee. B. The freedom of speech monument committee shall nominate and approve two individuals from different political parties each year to be added to the freedom of speech monument for their contributions to preserving freedom of speech in this state. C. Individuals who are nominated pursuant to subsection B of this section must be deceased for at least five years. D. The committee shall meet on the call of the chairperson. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Freedom of speech monument; procedures; delayed repeal A. Pursuant to section 41-1363, subsection A, Arizona Revised Statutes, this act authorizes the legislative council to provide for the placement of a freedom of speech monument in the governmental mall. B. The procedures prescribed in section 41-1363, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, apply to the placement of the monument. C. Public monies are not authorized for the costs of the placement of the monument.  All fundraising and contracts for artistic design and construction of the monument are the sole responsibility of the proponents.  This state may not facilitate fundraising or establish a state fund for the deposit of the monies. D. This section is repealed from and after September 30, 2029.